Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1122.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2930.07, to read: START_STATUTE36-2930.07. Prior authorization; behavioral health services; prohibition; exception Beginning January 1, 2027, the administration may not require one hundred percent prepayment review for behavioral health services provided to a member under the American Indian health program by a behavioral health provider unless the administration implements a corrective action plan and the provider is noncompliant or not engaged in the corrective action plan. END_STATUTE